New York, session 2025-2026, S1753.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 "Bella's Law". 3 § 2. Legislative intent. The legislature hereby finds that animal 4 cruelty is a serious problem and that individuals who harm and abuse 5 animals are statistically more likely to engage in domestic violence and 6 child abuse than individuals who do not harm and abuse animals. A strong 7 correlation has been established linking individuals who abuse animals 8 with incidents of domestic violence. Therefore, the purpose of this law 9 is to establish a requirement that the state of New York office of chil- 10 dren and family services must investigate any individual who is accused 11 of or investigated for animal cruelty to ensure that there is no associ- 12 ated domestic or family violence and that law enforcement notify and 13 coordinate with the office of children and family services in animal 14 cruelty investigations and arrests. 15 § 3. The agriculture and markets law is amended by adding a new 16 section 353-aa to read as follows: 17 § 353-aa. Animal abuse accusal requiring a domestic violence and abuse 18 investigation. 1. Definitions. As used in this section, the following 19 terms shall have the following meanings: 20 (a) "Animal" shall mean any live mammal, bird, or reptile, but shall 21 not include feeder animals. 22 (b) "Companion animal" shall mean any dog or cat, and shall also mean 23 any other domesticated animal normally maintained in or near the house- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04734-01-5 S. 1753 2 1 hold of the owner or person who cares for such other domesticated 2 animal. 3 (c) "Animal abuse crime" shall mean the commission of the following 4 enumerated crimes against an animal: 5 (1) animal fighting, as defined in section three hundred fifty-one of 6 this article; 7 (2) overdriving, torturing, and injuring animals; failure to provide 8 proper sustenance, as defined in section three hundred fifty-three of 9 this article; 10 (3) aggravated cruelty to animals, as defined in section three hundred 11 fifty-three-a of this article; 12 (4) electrocution of fur-bearing animals, as defined in section three 13 hundred fifty-three-c of this article 14 (5) abandonment of animals, as defined in section three hundred 15 fifty-five of this article; 16 (6) failure to provide proper food and drink to an impounded animal, 17 as defined in section three hundred fifty-six of this article; 18 (7) carrying animal in a cruel manner, as defined in section three 19 hundred fifty-nine of this article; 20 (8) poisoning or attempting to poison animals, as defined in section 21 three hundred sixty of this article; 22 (9) interference with or injury to certain domestic animals, as 23 defined in section four hundred sixty-one of this article; 24 (10) sexual misconduct with an animal, as defined in subdivision four 25 of section 130.20 of the penal law; 26 (11) harming an animal trained to aid a person with a disability in 27 the first degree, as defined in section 195.12 of the penal law; 28 (12) harming a service animal in the first degree, as defined in 29 section 242.15 of the penal law; 30 (13) harming a service animal in the second degree, as defined in 31 section 242.10 of the penal law; or 32 (14) an offense in any other jurisdiction which includes all the 33 essential elements of any such crime provided for in this subdivision. 34 (d) "Accused" shall mean a formal accusation of an animal abuse crime 35 commenced by the filing of an information, complaint, or indictment with 36 a court of competent jurisdiction. 37 (e) "Investigated" shall mean a reasonable suspicion that an individ- 38 ual is engaging in an animal abuse crime that has commenced an investi- 39 gation into such conduct by a law enforcement agency with jurisdiction 40 covering the state of New York. 41 (f) "Domestic incident report" shall mean a state of New York division 42 of criminal justice services form three thousand two hundred twenty-one, 43 as established by the "family protection and domestic violence inter- 44 vention act of 1994". 45 2. Duty to investigate. (a) Upon notification of an accusation or 46 investigation of an animal abuse crime, the office of children and fami- 47 ly services shall promptly log and investigate the individual that has 48 been accused or is being investigated. The office of children and family 49 services shall, where practicable, reasonable, and not in contravention 50 of law, coordinate such investigation with and communicate any results 51 to the referring or prosecuting agency. 52 (b) Such investigation shall determine whether the accused or investi- 53 gated party has any associated family or domestic violence. 54 3. Sharing of information. (a) Where practicable, reasonable, and not 55 in contravention of law, the office of children and family services 56 shall be notified by law enforcement of investigations and accusations S. 1753 3 1 of animal abuse crimes where such investigations or accusations arise in 2 connection in such law enforcement's professional or official capacity. 3 Nothing herein shall mandate such reporting: (i) where it would jeopard- 4 ize an ongoing investigation or the personal safety of an individual; 5 (ii) in circumstances where it is clear that the accused or investigated 6 individual has no family members and no need for personal services from 7 the office of children and family services; or (iii) where the partic- 8 ular investigation or accusation was previously reported. Such law 9 enforcement members shall document response, investigation, and actions 10 taken in keeping with this mandate, including, where appropriate, on a 11 domestic incident report. 12 (b) A domestic incident report shall be prepared in every instance of 13 abuse or threatened abuse against the companion animal of another family 14 member, even if investigation of the incident reveals that no crime or 15 offense was committed. 16 4. Applicability. This law shall apply to all persons accused or 17 investigated of animal abuse crimes on or after the effective date of 18 this section. 19 5. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 20 section, or part of this law to the application thereof to any person, 21 individual, corporation, firm, partnership, entity or circumstance shall 22 be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid or 23 unconstitutional, such order or judgment shall not affect, impair or 24 invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation 25 to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part of this 26 law or in its application to the person, individual, corporation, firm, 27 partnership entity or circumstance directly involved in the controversy 28 in which an order or judgment shall be rendered. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.